Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EMERALD ASH BORER WOOD DISPOSAL; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the ....... fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to the owner of a biomass energy generation plant in Shakopee that uses waste heat from the generation of electricity in the malting process to purchase equipment to facilitate the disposal of wood that is infested by the emerald ash borer. new text end